Rhode Island statutes. Title 20 Fish and Wildlife
Chapter 13 Hunting and Hunting Safety

20-13-1.
License required — Hunting on own land.

No person shall hunt, pursue, take, or kill any wild bird or mammal and any vertebrates in this state, or attempt so to do, without having first obtained a license; provided, that nothing in this chapter shall be construed as affecting the right of a bona fide resident of this state, or the resident’s immediate family, to hunt, without a license, on land owned by the resident, or land leased by the resident, and on which he or she is actually domiciled, and which land is used exclusively for agricultural purposes, and not for club shooting purposes, nor as affecting, in any way, the provisions of the laws relating to trespass, nor as authorizing the pursuit, taking, wounding, or killing, or the possession, of wild birds or mammals and any vertebrates contrary to any laws now in force or that may be enacted.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-13-2.
Safety instruction — Certificate of competency — Liability.

The department of environmental management shall formulate courses of instruction in safe hunting practices and the handling and use of firearms and/or bow and arrow for persons applying for a license for the first time and shall designate one or more competent persons or organizations to give that instruction. Any person or organization so designated shall give safety instruction without charge to any person requesting instruction and shall, upon the successful completion of the course, forward the name of that person to the department. The department shall issue a certificate of competency to that person. The department may designate the police authorities of the several cities and towns to give safety instruction.

There shall be no civil liability incurred, and no cause of action of any nature shall arise, against any member of the department of environmental management, its agents, servants, or employees, as a result of any decisions made by the department of environmental management, its members, agents, servants, or employees, under this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-13-2.1.
Availability of safety instruction.

The department of environmental management shall make available the safety instruction required by §

20-13-2

on a continuing basis throughout the year at sites throughout the state for the convenience of the public. In no event shall safety instruction be offered less frequently than once each month. The department shall publish the dates and location of instruction in newspapers of general circulation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 296, § 1.

20-13-3.
Appeal of refusal of certificate.

Any person who has been refused designation as having successfully completed the courses taken under the provisions of §

20-13-2

may appeal that refusal to the director of environmental management who shall make the final determination of the competency of the applicant.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-13-4.
Certificate of competency required for initial license.

No license to hunt shall be issued to any person unless that person has held a hunting license in a prior year or unless he or she presents to the licensing agent a certificate of competency issued under §

20-13-2

, or under an equivalent hunter safety program adopted by any other state; provided, that in the case of those qualifying only for use of archery equipment, the licensing agent shall mark across the face of the license “archery only.” A hunting license designated “archery only” is limited to the use of bows and arrows while hunting or pursuing game in this state. Each agent shall transmit all competency certificates presented to the agent to the department of environmental management, along with the reports required to be filed pursuant to §

20-2-3

.

Any person who is serving in, or who has been honorably discharged from, the army, navy, air force, marine corps, or coast guard, or any women’s auxiliary branch, is not required to obtain a certificate of competency under this section or §

20-13-2

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-13-5.
Issuance of licenses.

Authorized licensing agents, shall, upon the application of any eligible person and the payment of the license fee, issue to that person a license to pursue, hunt, and kill game in the state during the open season with firearms or by bow and arrow with an archer’s permit; provided, however, that no license shall be granted to or possessed by:

Any person under fifteen (15) years of age; provided, however, a junior hunting license may be obtained for persons age twelve (12) to fourteen (14) years of age upon the completion of a basic hunter’s safety course; and further provided, that they shall hunt only in the immediate company of a qualified, licensed adult twenty-one (21) years of age or over;

Any person who has been convicted of a crime of violence, or who is a fugitive from justice, as defined in §

11-47-2

of the Firearms Act; or

Any person who is under guardianship, treatment, or confinement by virtue of being a mental incompetent; or who has been adjudicated or is under treatment or confinement as a drug addict; or who has been adjudicated or is under treatment or confinement as a habitual drunkard.

Any person affected by the provisions of subsection (a)(3), other than a person who has been pronounced criminally insane by a competent medical authority, after a lapse of a period of five (5) years from the date of being pronounced cured by a competent medical authority, may obtain a license upon the presentation of an affidavit issued by a competent medical authority to the effect that that person is a mentally stable person and a proper person to possess a hunting license. If that person has no other disqualifying record, he or she will be allowed to purchase and possess a hunting license.

Every hunting license shall bear the name, age, occupation, place of residence, and an identifying description of the licensee; and shall expire on the last day of February next succeeding the date of issue; and may be revoked within the discretion of the director of environmental management. Every hunting license shall plainly and conspicuously indicate upon its face the year of issuance and shall be in the form prescribed by the director.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3; P.L. 2016, ch. 130, § 2; P.L. 2016, ch. 136, § 2.

20-13-6.
Export privileges of nonresident licensees.

Each nonresident hunting license shall enable the licensee to carry from the state not more than a two-day (2) bag limit of native game birds or animals nor more than the limit of migratory birds set by federal regulations; provided, that the owner shall carry them open to view for inspection.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-13-7.
Shooting in proximity to occupied buildings.

It is unlawful for any person, while hunting or pursuing wild birds or wild animals in this state, to shoot or discharge any firearm or other deadly weapon within five hundred feet (500´) of any occupied dwelling house, residence, or other building occupied by human beings, or any barn, stable, or other building used in connection therewith, without the specific permission of the owner or tenant.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-13-8.
Loaded weapons in vehicles.

It is unlawful for any person to have in his or her possession a loaded rifle or loaded shotgun or a rifle or shotgun from the magazine of which all shells and cartridges have not been removed, in or on any vehicle or conveyance or its attachments while upon or along any public highway, road, lane, or trail within this state; provided, however, that the provisions of this section shall not apply to deputy sheriffs, the superintendent and members of the state police, prison or jail wardens or their deputies, members of the city or town police force, or other duly appointed law enforcement officers, including conservation officers and park police, nor to members of the army, navy, air force, and marine corps of the United States, the national guard or organized reserves, when on duty, or officers or employees of the United States authorized by law to carry a concealed firearm, nor to any civilian guard or criminal investigator carrying sidearms or a concealed firearm in the performance of his or her official duties under the authority of the commanding officer of the military establishment in the state of Rhode Island where he or she is employed by the United States.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3; P.L. 2012, ch. 324, § 50.

20-13-9.
Hunting along or across highways.

It is unlawful for any person to hunt, pursue, kill, or shoot at any bird or animal along, upon, or across any public highway in this state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-13-10.
Carrying of weapon while under the influence of liquor or drugs.

It is unlawful to hunt anywhere in this state, or to enter any of the fields or woods, or to enter upon any lands or water within or bordering this state, while possessing a firearm or other weapon for the purpose of hunting when intoxicated or under the influence of intoxicating or controlled substances.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-13-11.
Maximum size of hunting parties.

It is unlawful for more than five (5) persons to hunt in unison, or to cooperate in any manner with each other to hunt, for wild birds or wild animals of any kind.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-13-12.
Reports of hunting injuries.

Every person causing an injury to a human being by gunfire while hunting; or inflicting an injury upon himself or herself with firearms while hunting; or inflicting an injury upon himself or herself while trapping shall make a report to the department of environmental management within seventy-two (72) hours after the injury, unless that person is physically incapable of making the required report, in which event it is the duty of that person to designate some other person to file the report within the specified time.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-13-13.
Restriction on size of weapons and ammunition.

Whoever uses or has in his or her possession while hunting in this state any rifle: (a) larger than a twenty-two (22) caliber rim fire rifle; or (b) other than a muzzle loading rifle; or (c) other than any shotgun and shells loaded with ball, bullets, slug; or shot larger than number two (no. 2) shot, shall be fined not more than five hundred dollars ($500) or imprisoned not exceeding thirty (30) days, or both; provided, however, that from April 1 to September 30, both dates inclusive, no center fire rifles larger than .229 caliber may be used during daylight hours; and provided further, that persons hunting water fowl in a blind or over decoys may use steel shot of size number one (no. 1) or BB.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3; P.L. 1984, ch. 417, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 364, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 81, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 91, § 1.

20-13-14.
Sale of game prohibited.

It shall be unlawful for any person to sell, or offer for sale, within this state, at any season of the year, any wild bird or mammal or any vertebrate, or parts thereof, except as provided elsewhere in this title; provided, however, that this section shall not be construed to prohibit the sale of inedible parts of game, such as antlers, hides, feet, or tails.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-13-15.
Failure to render assistance to injured person.

Any person causing an injury to another person by firearm or arrow while hunting failing to render assistance to the injured person shall, in addition to any other penalties provided by law, be subject to a fine of up to one thousand dollars ($1,000) or imprisonment for up to one year, or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-13-16.
Harassment of hunters, trappers, and fishers prohibited.

No person shall obstruct or interfere with the lawful taking of wildlife by another person at the location where the activity is taking place with intent to prevent the lawful taking.

A person violates this section when he or she intentionally or knowingly:

Drives or disturbs wildlife for the purpose of disrupting the lawful taking of wildlife where another person is engaged in the process of lawfully taking wildlife;

Blocks, impedes, or otherwise harasses another person who is engaged in the process of lawfully taking wildlife;

Uses natural or artificial visual, aural, olfactory, or physical stimuli to affect wildlife behavior in order to hinder or prevent the lawful taking of wildlife;

Erects barriers with the intent to deny ingress or egress to areas where the lawful taking of wildlife may occur;

Interjects himself or herself into the line of fire;

Affects the condition or placement of personal or public property intended for use in the lawful taking of wildlife in order to impair its usefulness or prevent its use; or

Enters or remains upon private lands without the permission of the owner, or the owner’s agent, with intent to violate this section.

A violation of this section is a civil violation for which a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500) may be adjudged. The traffic tribunal shall have jurisdiction to hear and determine all violations specified in this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 312, § 2; P.L. 1998, ch. 441, § 17; P.L. 2021, ch. 98, § 2, effective July 1, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 99, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.

20-13-17.
Injunctive relief — Damages.

The district court may enjoin conduct that would be in violation of §

20-13-16

, upon petition by a person affected or who reasonably may be affected by this conduct, upon a showing that this conduct is threatened or that it has occurred on a particular premises in the past and that it is not unreasonable to expect that under similar circumstances it will be repeated.

The district court may award damages to any person adversely affected by a violation of §

20-13-16

, which may include an award for punitive damages. In addition to other items of special damage, the measure of damages may include expenditures of the affected person for license and permit fees, travel guides, special equipment and supplies, to the extent that those expenditures were rendered futile by the prevention of the taking of a wild animal.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 312, § 2.